Utah statutes.
26A-1-112.   Appointment of personnel.

(1)  All local health department personnel shall be hired by the local health officer or the local health officer's designee in accordance with the merit system, personnel policies, and compensation plans approved by the board and ratified pursuant to Subsection (2).  The personnel shall have qualifications for their positions equivalent to those approved for comparable positions in the Departments of Health and Environmental Quality.

(2)  The merit system, personnel policies, and compensation plans approved under Subsection (1) shall be ratified by all the counties participating in the local health department.

(3)  Subject to the local merit system, employees of the local health department may be removed by the local health officer for cause.  A hearing shall be granted if requested by the employee.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

